Hawaii statutes.
I. Aquarium and Marine Laboratory

[§304A-1651] State aquarium. (a) The
Waikiki aquarium is established and designated as the official state aquarium.

(b) The university may contract with a private
nonprofit entity for the operation and management of the state aquarium;
provided that the entity is a private nonprofit corporation established solely
to:

(1) Manage and improve the exhibits and facilities;

(2) Conduct education, research, volunteer,
fund-raising, and membership programs; and

(3) Operate concessions of the state aquarium.

(c) The status conferred by subsections (a)
and (b) shall not impinge on the ownership of land and improvements which shall
remain with the university. All board of regents' policies regarding the use
of university facilities shall apply to the state aquarium. [L 2006, c 75, pt
of §2]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next